Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 31

Polysomnography

63-31-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of medical examiners;

“Committee” means the polysomnography professional standards committee established by § 63-31-103;

“Direct supervision” means that the polysomnographic technologist providing supervision must be present in the area where the polysomnographic procedure is being performed and immediately available to furnish assistance and direction throughout the performance of the procedure;

“General supervision” means that the polysomnographic procedure is provided under a physician's overall direction and control, but the physician's presence is not required during the performance of the procedure;

“Polysomnographic student” means a person who is enrolled in an educational program that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs (CAAHEP), as provided in § 63-31-106(b)(1), and who may provide sleep-related services under the direct supervision of a polysomnographic technologist as a part of the person's educational program;

“Polysomnographic technician” means a person who has graduated from an accredited educational program described in § 63-31-106(b)(1) but has not yet passed the national certifying examination given by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists, who has obtained a temporary permit from the board, and who may provide sleep-related services under the general supervision of a licensed physician;

“Polysomnographic technologist” means a person who is credentialed by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists and is licensed by the board to engage in the practice of polysomnography under the general supervision of a licensed physician;

“Polysomnographic trainee” means a person who is enrolled in an accredited sleep technologist education program (A-STEP) that is accredited by the American Academy of Sleep Medicine and who may provide sleep-related services under the direct supervision of a polysomnographic technologist as a part of the person's educational program;

“Practice of polysomnography” means the staging and scoring of sleep by continuous and simultaneous monitoring of the stages of sleep and wake through use of an electroencephalogram (EEG), an electroculogram (EOG) and a submental electromyogram (EMG), in conjunction with the recording and monitoring of other physiological variables, and the assignment of values for duration, frequency and type of event to each stage of sleep in which the event occurred. The following tasks are considered a part of the practice of polysomnography only when performed as part of the staging and scoring of sleep under the general supervision of a licensed physician:

Monitoring and recording physiologic data during the evaluation of sleep-related disorders, including sleep-related respiratory disturbances, by applying the following techniques, equipment, and procedures:

Continuous or bilevel positive airway pressure titration on spontaneously breathing patients using a mask or oral appliance; provided, that the mask or oral appliance does not extend into the trachea or attach to an artificial airway;

Supplemental low flow oxygen therapy of less than six (6) liters per minute, utilizing nasal cannula or continuous or bilevel positive airway pressure during a polysomnogram;

Capnography during a polysomnogram;

Cardiopulmonary resuscitation;

Pulse oximetry;

Gastroesophageal pH monitoring;

Esophageal pressure monitoring;

Sleep staging, including surface electroencephalography, surface electrooculography, and surface submental electromyography;

Surface electromyography;

Electrocardiography;

Respiratory effort monitoring, including thoracic and abdominal movement;

Plethysmography blood flow monitoring;

Snore monitoring;

Audio or video monitoring;

Body movement monitoring;

Nocturnal penile tumescence monitoring;

Nasal and oral airflow monitoring;

Body temperature monitoring; and

Monitoring the effects that a mask or oral appliance used to treat sleep disorders has on sleep patterns; provided, however, that the mask or oral appliance shall not extend into the trachea or attach to an artificial airway;

Observing and monitoring physical signs and symptoms, general behavior, and general physical response to polysomnographic evaluation and determining whether initiation, modification, or discontinuation of a treatment regimen is warranted;

Analyzing and scoring data collected during the monitoring described in subdivisions (9)(A)(i) and (ii) for the purpose of assisting a licensed physician in the diagnosis and treatment of sleep and wake disorders that result from developmental defects, the aging process, physical injury, disease, or actual or anticipated somatic dysfunction;

Implementation of a written or verbal order from a licensed physician that requires the practice of polysomnography; and

Education of a patient regarding the treatment regimen that assists the patient in improving the patient's sleep;

A licensed dentist shall make or direct the making and use of any oral appliance used to treat sleep disordered breathing and shall evaluate the structures of the patient's oral and maxillofacial region for purposes of fitting the appliance;

The practice of polysomnography shall take place only in a hospital, a stand-alone sleep laboratory or sleep center, or in the patient's home in accordance with a physician's order; provided, however, that the scoring of data and the education of patients may take place in settings other than in a sleep laboratory, sleep center or the patient's home; and

“Sleep-related services” means acts performed by polysomnographic technicians, polysomnographic trainees, polysomnographic students, and other persons permitted to perform those services under this chapter, in a setting described in subdivision (9)(C) that would be considered the practice of polysomnography if performed by a polysomnographic technologist.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1; 2009, ch. 421, § 1.

63-31-102. Interpretation of chapter — Application.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to limit or restrict a health care practitioner licensed under this title from engaging in the full scope of practice of the person's profession.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to diagnostic electroencephalograms conducted in accordance with the guidelines of the American Clinical Neurophysiology Society.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

63-31-103. Polysomnography professional standards committee.

To assist the board in the performance of its duties under this chapter, there is established the polysomnography professional standards committee.

The committee shall consist of seven (7) members, who shall be appointed by the governor in the manner and for the terms of office as set forth in this section.

The committee shall be composed of:

Three (3) registered polysomnographic technologists;

One (1) physician who is certified in sleep medicine by a national certifying body recognized by the American Academy of Sleep Medicine;

One (1) person who is the director of an accredited, hospital-based sleep center;

One (1) respiratory therapist who is also a registered polysomnographic technologist; and

One (1) consumer member who is not commercially or professionally associated with the health care field, either directly or indirectly.

Notwithstanding § 3-6-304 or any other law to the contrary, and in addition to all other requirements for membership on the committee:

Any person registered as a lobbyist pursuant to the registration requirements of title 3, chapter 6 who is subsequently appointed or otherwise named as a member of the committee shall terminate all employment and business association as a lobbyist with any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the committee, prior to serving as a member of the committee. This subdivision (d)(1)(A) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the committee after July 1, 2010;

No person who is a member of the committee shall be permitted to register or otherwise serve as a lobbyist pursuant to title 3, chapter 6 for any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the committee during such person's period of service as a member of the committee. This subdivision (d)(1)(B) shall apply to all persons appointed or otherwise named to the committee after July 1, 2010, and to all persons serving on the committee on such date who are not registered as lobbyists; and

No person who serves as a member of the committee shall be employed as a lobbyist by any entity whose business endeavors or professional activities are regulated by the committee for one (1) year following the date such person's service on the committee ends. This subdivision (d)(1)(C) shall apply to persons serving on the committee as of July 1, 2010, and to persons appointed to the committee subsequent to such date.

A person who violates this subsection (d) shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in title 3, chapter 6.

The bureau of ethics and campaign finance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (d). All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and in accordance with the procedure for initiating and proposing rules by the ethics commission to the bureau of ethics and campaign finance as prescribed in § 4-55-103.

Initial appointments to the committee shall be made as follows: two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of four (4) years, two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of three (3) years, two (2) members shall be appointed to terms of two (2) years, and one (1) member shall be appointed to a term of one (1) year. Each regular appointment thereafter shall be for a term of four (4) years. Any vacant term shall be filled by the governor for the balance of the four-year term and each member shall serve on the committee until a successor is appointed. In making appointments to the committee, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the committee is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the committee is a member of a racial minority. Each member of the committee shall be a resident of the state.

The governor may consider for appointment to the committee the names of persons recommended by the professional organizations for each profession represented on the committee. The Tennessee Sleep Society may submit a list of three (3) names for each position to be filled by a polysomnographic technologist. The Tennessee Society for Respiratory Care may submit a list of three (3) names for the position to be filled by a respiratory therapist. The Tennessee Medical Association may submit a list of three (3) names for the position to be filled by a physician. The Tennessee Hospital Association (THA), an association of hospitals and health systems may submit a list of three (3) names for the position to be filled by a director of a hospital-based sleep center.

While engaged in the business of the committee, members shall receive a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) and shall also receive compensation for actual expenses to be paid in accordance with comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the commissioner of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The committee shall choose annually a chair and a secretary from among its members.

The committee shall hold at least one (1) regular meeting each year and such other meetings as the committee deems necessary to conduct its business.

A majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. No action of the committee shall be valid unless approved by a majority of members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum.

The governor has the power to remove from office any member of the committee for neglect of duties required by this chapter, for malfeasance in office, for incompetence, or for unprofessional conduct.

All funds received by the committee shall be deposited into the state treasury, and the department of health shall make such allotments out of the committee's account in the general fund as the department deems proper for the necessary expenses of the committee.

The division of health related boards shall provide administrative, investigatory, and clerical services to the committee as necessary to implement and enforce this chapter.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1; 2010, ch. 996, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. The polysomnographic professional standards committee, created by this section, terminated June 30, 2020, and is in its wind-up period, pursuant to the provisions of § 4-29-112. Wind-up is scheduled to be complete June 30, 2021. See § 4-29-112.

63-31-104. Powers of the committee.

The committee shall have the power to:

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules that are necessary for the implementation and administration of this chapter;

Establish the fees to be paid for temporary permits and for initial licensure, renewal or reinstatement of a license, late renewal of a license, and replacement of a lost license, at a level that is adequate to pay all the expenses of implementing and administering this chapter, in accordance with § 63-1-137;

Review and approve or reject the application of each person who applies for licensure as a polysomnographic technologist;

Biennially review and approve or reject each application for license renewal;

Issue, in the board's name, all temporary permits and all approved licenses and renewal of licenses;

Collect or receive all fees, fines, and money owed pursuant to this chapter and pay the fees, fines and money into the general fund of the state;

Deny, suspend, revoke, restrict, or impose one (1) or more conditions on a license, as the committee deems necessary or appropriate at the time a license is issued, renewed, or reinstated, or as a sanction imposed at the conclusion of a disciplinary hearing;

Issue private advisory letter rulings to any person licensed under this chapter who makes a request for a ruling regarding any matter within the committee's jurisdiction; provided, however, that the ruling shall affect only the licensee making the inquiry and shall have no precedential value for any other contested case or inquiry before the committee;

Develop a code of ethics for the practice of polysomnography in this state;

Develop standards of care for the practice of polysomnography in this state;

Develop standards for the educational and clinical training of polysomnographic technologists, including the evaluation of the accreditation status of educational programs in polysomnography;

Develop criteria for the evaluation of applications for licensure submitted by registered polysomnographic technologists who are licensed in other states;

Develop continuing education requirements that shall be met by licensed polysomnographic technologists; and

Conduct disciplinary hearings in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and impose whatever sanctions the committee deems appropriate on an applicant or licensee.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

63-31-105. Board approval of committee actions.

All actions of the committee shall be approved by the board in order to become final actions. All actions of the committee shall be considered by the board at its next regular meeting after the committee has taken its actions.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

63-31-106. Licensing requirement.

On and after July 1, 2010, any person who is engaged in the practice of polysomnography shall be licensed as provided in this chapter. It shall be unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of polysomnography after July 1, 2010, unless the person has been duly licensed as a polysomnographic technologist under this chapter.

Prior to July 1, 2010, any person who is engaged in the practice of polysomnography without being licensed under this chapter shall not be deemed to be in violation of this chapter or the Respiratory Care Practitioner Act, compiled in chapter 27 of this title.

A person seeking licensure as a polysomnographic technologist shall be of good moral character, shall be at least eighteen (18) years of age, shall pay the fees established by the board for licensure, and shall present proof that the person meets all of the following requirements:

Meet one (1) of the following educational requirements:

Graduation from a polysomnographic educational program that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs;

Graduation from a respiratory care educational program that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs and completion of the curriculum for a polysomnography certificate established and accredited by the Committee on Accreditation for Respiratory Care of the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs;

Graduation from an electroneurodiagnostic technologist educational program with a polysomnographic technology track that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs; or

Successful completion of an accredited sleep technologist educational program (A-STEP) that is accredited by the American Academy of Sleep Medicine; provided, however, that this option shall not remain available after July 1, 2012, if there are at least four (4) polysomnographic technologist educational programs in this state, at least two (2) in the east grand division and one (1) each in the middle and west grand divisions that remain accredited by the commission on accreditation of allied health educational programs for two (2) years. If there are not four (4) such accredited educational programs by July 12, 2012, this option shall remain available until there are four (4) such programs that have been accredited for two (2) years;

Pass the national certifying examination given by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists;

Be credentialed by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists; and

Meet any additional educational or clinical requirements established by the committee.

Any person who is engaged in the practice of polysomnography on July 1, 2007, shall be eligible for licensure under this chapter without meeting the educational requirement of subdivision (b)(1); provided, that the person meets the requirements of subdivisions (b)(2)-(4).

To be eligible for renewal of a license to engage in the practice of polysomnography, a polysomnographic technologist shall continue to be credentialed by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-31-107. Classes exempt from licensing requirement — Temporary permit.

The following persons may provide sleep-related services without being licensed as a polysomnographic technologist under this chapter:

A polysomnographic technician may provide sleep-related services under the general supervision of a licensed physician for a period of up to one (1) year from the date of the person's graduation from one (1) of the accredited programs described in § 63-31-106(b)(1), and the board may in its sole discretion grant a one-time extension of up to three (3) months beyond this one-year period;

A polysomnographic trainee may provide sleep-related services under the direct supervision of a polysomnographic technologist as a part of the person's educational program while actively enrolled in an accredited sleep technologist educational program (A-STEP) that is accredited by the American Academy of Sleep Medicine;

A polysomnographic student may provide sleep-related services under the direct supervision of a polysomnographic technologist as a part of the person's educational program while actively enrolled in a polysomnographic educational program that is accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Allied Health Education Programs (CAAHEP);

A person who is credentialed in one (1) of the health-related fields accepted by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists may provide sleep-related services under the direct supervision of a polysomnographic technologist, for a period of up to one (1) year, while obtaining the clinical experience necessary to be eligible to sit for the examination given by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists; and

Respiratory therapists who provide polysomnography services shall be credentialed as a registered polysomnographic technologist by the board of polysomnographic technologists, or as a sleep disorders specialist by the national board for respiratory care, or have undergone a standardized, uniform mechanism to document competency in polysomnography as approved by the Tennessee board of respiratory care with documentation of passage of this mechanism made available at the request of the board of respiratory care. The Tennessee board of respiratory care shall consult with the Tennessee board of medical examiners in the development of this mechanism. The consultation with the board of medical examiners shall be documented and the documentation, including any comments by the board of medical examiners regarding the mechanism developed by the board of respiratory care, shall be filed with the chairs of the health committee of the house of representatives and the health and welfare committee of the senate. Respiratory therapists are not required to have a second license as a polysomnographic technologist.

Before providing any sleep-related services, a polysomnographic technician shall obtain a temporary permit from the board. While providing sleep-related services, the technician shall wear a badge that appropriately identifies the person as a polysomnographic technician.

Before providing any sleep-related services, a polysomnographic trainee shall give notice to the board that the trainee is enrolled in an A-STEP educational program accredited by the American Academy of Sleep Medicine. Trainees shall wear a badge that appropriately identifies the trainee as a polysomnographic trainee while providing such services.

Before providing any sleep-related services, a person who is obtaining clinical experience pursuant to subdivision (a)(4) shall give notice to the board that the person is working under the direct supervision of a polysomnographic technologist in order to gain the experience to be eligible to sit for the examination given by the board of registered polysomnographic technologists. The person shall wear a badge that appropriately identifies the person while providing such services.

Polysomnographic students shall not receive compensation for the sleep-related services they provide and shall wear badges that appropriately identify them as students.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1; 2009, ch. 421, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 55.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-31-108. Issuance, renewal
and retirement of licenses — Display of license —
Lost license — Change of address or name.

Licenses shall be issued and renewed by the board pursuant to the biennial issuance and renewal system of the division of health related boards.

Any person who has been issued a license to practice under this chapter who wishes to retire that license shall file with the committee an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the committee stating the date on which the person retired from practice and other facts that verify the retirement as the board deems necessary. Any such person who thereafter wishes to reenter practice shall request reinstatement of licensure.

Any license issued by the board shall contain the name of the person to whom it is issued, the address of the person, the date and number of the license and other information that the board deems necessary. The address contained on the license shall be the address where all correspondence and renewal forms from the board shall be sent. Any person whose address changes shall, within thirty (30) days after the change in address, notify the board of the address change. The most recent address contained in the board's records for each license holder shall be the address deemed sufficient for purposes of service of process.

Every person issued a license pursuant to this chapter shall either keep the license prominently displayed in the office or place in which the person practices or have it stored in a place from which it can be immediately produced upon request of a patient or representative of the department of health.

Any person whose license has been lost may make application to the committee for a replacement. The application shall be accompanied by an affidavit setting out the facts concerning the loss of the original license.

Any person whose name is changed by marriage or court order may surrender the person's license and apply to the board for a replacement license.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

Cross-References. Display of license or registration certificate, § 63-1-109.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-31-109. Power of board to impose sanctions.

The board has the power to impose any sanctions on a licensee, up to and including license revocation, if the licensee is found guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or of committing any of the following acts or offenses:

Making false or misleading statements or committing fraud in procuring a license;

Moral turpitude;

Habitual intoxication or personal misuse of narcotics, controlled substances, controlled substance analogues or any other drugs or the use of alcoholic beverages or stimulants in a manner that adversely affects the person's ability to practice polysomnography;

Conviction of a felony or of any offense involving moral turpitude or any violation of the drug laws of this or any other state or of the United States;

Violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, assisting in or abetting the violation of, or conspiring to violate, this chapter or any lawful order of the board or any criminal statute of this state;

Gross health care liability, ignorance, negligence or incompetence in the course of professional practice;

Making or signing in one's professional capacity any document that is known to be false at the time it is made or signed;

Engaging in the practice of polysomnography when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Making false statements or representations or being guilty of fraud or deceit in the practice of polysomnography when mentally or physically unable to safely do so;

Having disciplinary action imposed by another state or territory of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a person licensed to practice polysomnography in this state; provided, that a certified copy of the order or other document memorializing the disciplinary action by the other state or territory constitutes prima facie evidence of a violation of this section;

Undertaking any duties that are outside the authorized scope of practice of a licensed polysomnographic technologist, as set forth in this chapter;

Violating the code of ethics adopted by the committee for polysomnographic technologists;

Use or attempted use of a polysomnographic procedure or equipment for which the licensee has not received sufficient education or training in the proper use of that procedure or equipment;

Promoting the sale of services, drugs, devices, appliances, or goods to a patient to exploit the patient for financial gain;

Willfully failing to file, or willfully impeding the filing of, any report or record that is required by law;

Knowingly engaging in the practice of polysomnography with an unlicensed person, knowingly aiding an unlicensed person in the practice of polysomnography, or knowingly delegating a task involved in the practice of polysomnography to an unlicensed person;

Knowingly failing to meet appropriate standards for the delivery of polysomnographic services;

Breaching patient confidentiality;

Paying or agreeing to pay any sum or providing any form of remuneration or material benefit to any person for bringing or referring a patient, or accepting or agreeing to accept any form of remuneration or material benefit from a person for bringing or referring a patient; or

Any other unprofessional or unethical conduct specified in the rules of the board.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1; 2012, ch. 798, § 51; 2012, ch. 848, § 84; 2018, ch. 745, § 45.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, § 63-1-134.

63-31-110. Violation.

Any person who engages in the practice of polysomnography in violation of this chapter is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

63-31-111. Injunction against unlicensed practice — Jurisdiction of court.

The board shall have the authority to petition any circuit or chancery court having jurisdiction over any person who is practicing without a license, or to whom a license has been denied, or whose license has been suspended or revoked by action of the board, to enjoin the person from continuing to practice within this state.

Jurisdiction is conferred upon the circuit and chancery courts of this state to hear and determine all causes brought under subsection (a) and to exercise full and complete jurisdiction in the injunctive proceedings.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-31-112. Screening panel for investigative and disciplinary process.

The committee may utilize one (1) or more screening panels in its investigative and disciplinary process to assure that complaints filed and investigations conducted are meritorious and to act as a mechanism for resolution of complaints or diversion to professional peer review organizations or impaired professionals' associations or foundations of those cases that the board, through established guidelines, deems appropriate.

The screening panel has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses.

Members of a screening panel may be drawn from the membership of the committee or may be appointed by the committee. Noncommittee members shall meet the requirements of membership on the committee and may include a consumer member. A committee member serving on a panel shall not participate in a contested case involving any matter heard by the panel.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

Cross-References. Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Screening panels, § 63-1-138.

63-31-113. Use of title “polysomnographic technologist” or abbreviation “PSGP”.

Any person who is licensed to engage in the practice of polysomnography in this state shall have the right to use the title “polysomnographic technologist” or the abbreviation “PSGP.” No other person may use that title or abbreviation or any other words or letters indicating that the person is a polysomnographic technologist.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.

63-31-114. Annual meeting of standards committee.

The polysomnographic professional standards committee shall conduct at least one (1) meeting in each of the years 2007-2010 to allow public discussion of new developments in the practice of polysomnography, including, but not limited to, the availability of accredited polysomnographic educational programs to persons in all parts of the state, the availability of other certification examinations and credentialing bodies, and the settings in which the practice of polysomnography may properly take place. The committee shall notify the Tennessee Sleep Society, the Tennessee Society for Respiratory Care, the Tennessee Medical Association, the Tennessee Hospital Association (THA), an association of hospitals and health systems, and any other person or organization that requests to be notified as to the time and place of the annual meeting.

Acts 2007, ch. 469, § 1.